Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1732
Foreign support order; how enforced.

A foreign support order entered pursuant to section 43-1729 shall be enforceable by withholding from income derived in this state in the manner and with the same effect as income withholding based on a support order of this state, except that any hearing requested by the obligor to contest any proposed income withholding shall be held by a court as provided in section 43-1733 instead of by the department. Entry of the order shall not confer jurisdiction on the courts of this state for any purpose other than income withholding.

Laws 1985, Second Spec. Sess., LB 7, § 52.